Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7512.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-65-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-65 entitled "Contractors’
Registration and Licensing Board" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-65-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Appurtenances” means any accessory improvement to real estate associated with a
primary structure.
(2) “Board” means the contractors’ registration and licensing board established pursuant to
the provisions of § 5-65-14 or its designees.
(3) “Claim” means that portion of a complaint that pertains to the complainant’s assertion
that they are entitled to monetary damages, an order for specific performance of work and/or other
contractual or equitable relief or remedies on account of allegations or disputes between themself
and a contractor or themself and a subcontractor.
(4) “Claim for retainage” means an allegation that a person seeking payment of retainage
breached the person’s contract for the project; provided, however, that a “claim” related to a project
with a contract value of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be subject
to the applicable dispute resolution procedure, notice, and other requirements in the contract for
construction.
(5) “Complaint” means a written complaint submitted to the board or office with

allegations against or disputes involving a contractor, which may contain a claim component and/or
allegations that a contractor has violated provisions of this chapter or the regulations promulgated
hereunder.
(6) “Contract for construction” means a contract for which a lien may be established under
chapter 28 of title 34 or for state or municipal public works projects as defined in title 37 on a
project for which the person on whose contract with the project owner has an original contract price
of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); provided, however, that “contract
for construction” shall not include a project containing, or designed to contain, at least one, but not
more than four (4), dwelling units.
(7)(i) “Contractor” means a person who, in the pursuit of an independent business,
undertakes or offers to undertake or submits a bid, or for compensation and with or without the
intent to sell the structure constructs, alters, repairs, improves, moves over public highways, roads,
or streets, or demolishes a structure or to perform any work in connection with the construction,
alteration, repair, improvement, moving over public highways, roads, or streets, or demolition of a
structure, and the appurtenances thereto. For the purposes of this chapter, “appurtenances” includes,
but is not limited to, the installation, alteration, or repair of wells connected to a structure consistent
with chapter 13.2 of title 46, garage, carport, porch, patio, decks, docks, sheds, tents, gazebos,
walkways, fencing, driveways, retaining walls, swimming pools, sidewalks, stone/masonry walls,
and parking lots.
(ii) “Contractor” also means any person who performs services as an “insurance adjuster”
as defined in § 27-10-1.1, and who evaluates, inspects, opines upon, or recommends the feasibility,
method, scope, or cost of repair or replacement of a building component regulated under the state
building code, for use in the investigation, negotiation, appraisal, or settlement of an insurance
claim, shall be deemed to be engaging in contractor activity and must be properly registered under
this chapter unless otherwise licensed.
(ii)(iii) “Contractor” includes, but is not limited to, any person who purchases or owns
property and constructs, or for compensation arranges for the construction of, one or more
structures.
(iii)(iv) A certificate of registration is necessary for each “business entity” regardless of the
fact that each entity may be owned by the same individual.
(8) “Deliverable” means a project close-out document that shall be submitted by the person
seeking payment of retainage under the person’s contract for construction; provided, however, that
a lien waiver or release, which is a deliverable, shall comply with chapter 28 of title 34; provided,
further, that “deliverable” shall not include any document affirming, certifying, or confirming
LC003737 - Page 2 of 8

completion or correction of labor, materials, or other items furnished or incomplete or defective
work.
(9) “Dwelling unit” means a single unit providing complete independent-living facilities
for one or more persons, including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and
sanitation.
(10) “Hearing officer” means a person designated by the director of the department of
business regulation or the director’s designee to hear contested cases, contested enforcement
proceedings, contested administrative fines, and to render decisions or orders in accordance with
the “administrative procedures act,” chapter 35 of title 42.
(11) “Incomplete or defective work” means labor, materials, or any other item required for
full performance by a person seeking payment of retainage that remains to be furnished by the
person under the person’s contract for construction or that has been furnished by the person but
requires correction, repair, further completion, revision, or replacement; provided, however, that
“incomplete or defective work” shall not include deliverables or labor, materials, or any other item
to be repaired or replaced after substantial or final completion pursuant to a warranty, guarantee,
or other contractual obligation to correct defective work after substantial or final completion.
(12) “Monetary damages” means the dollar amount required in excess of the contract
amount necessary to provide the claimant with what was agreed to be provided under the terms of
the contract reduced by any amount due and unpaid to the respondent inclusive of any and all
awards and restitution.
(13) “Office” means the state building office established pursuant to § 5-84-3.1.
(14) “Person” means any natural person, joint venture, partnership, corporation, or other
business or legal entity who or that enters into a contract for construction.
(15) “Prime contractor” means a person who or that enters into a contract for construction
with the project owner.
(16) “Retainage” means a portion or percentage of a payment due pursuant to a contract
for construction that is withheld to ensure full performance of the contract for construction.
(17) “Staff” means any staff necessary to carry out the powers, functions, and duties of the
board, or the office, including inspectors, hearing officers, and other supportive staff.
(18) “State” means the state of Rhode Island.
(19) “Structure” means (i) Any commercial building; or (ii) Any building containing one
or more residences and their appurtenances. The board’s dispute resolution process shall apply only
to residential structures containing dwelling units, as defined in the state building code, or
residential portions of other types of buildings without regard to how many units any structure may
LC003737 - Page 3 of 8

contain. The board retains jurisdiction and may conduct hearings regarding violations against all
contractors required to be registered or licensed by the board.
(20) “Substantial completion” means the stage in the progress of the project when the work
required by the contract for construction with the project owner is sufficiently complete in
accordance with the contract for construction so that the project owner may occupy or utilize the
work for its intended use; provided, further, that “substantial completion” may apply to the entire
project or a phase of the entire project if the contract for construction with the project owner
expressly permits substantial completion to apply to defined phases of the project.
(21) “Violation” means a violation of any provision of this chapter or the regulations
promulgated hereunder or any order of the board or office.
SECTION 2. Section 5-65.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-65.1 entitled "Home
Inspectors" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-65.1-2. Definitions.
When used in this chapter:
(1) “Associate home inspector” means a person who is employed by a licensed home
inspector to conduct a home inspection of a residential building on behalf of a client for a fee under
the direct supervision of the licensed home inspector and is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) “Board” means the contractors’ registration and licensing board.
(3) “Client” means any person who engages, or seeks to engage, the services of a home
inspector for the purpose of obtaining an inspection of, and written report upon, the condition of a
residential building.
(4) “Home inspection” means an inspection and a written evaluation of the following
readily visible and accessible components of a residential building: heating, cooling, plumbing, and
electrical systems, structural components, foundation, roof, masonry structure, exterior and interior
components, and any other related residential housing components, unless the scope of the
inspection is otherwise clearly limited, in writing, in the inspection report. Unless otherwise
expressly agreed to, in writing, a home inspection shall be based solely on observation of the readily
visible and apparent condition of the foregoing components of a residential building as they exist
on the date of the inspection, and it is not the purpose of the inspection to identify violations of, or
noncompliance with, governmental codes or regulation. A home inspection shall, at a minimum,
conform to any standards of practice promulgated by the board.
(5) “Home inspector” means any person licensed as a home inspector to conduct a home
inspection of a residential building on behalf of a client for a fee pursuant to the provisions of this
LC003737 - Page 4 of 8

chapter.
(i) “Home inspector” also means any person who performs an inspection of commercial
and residential structures, roofing systems, or building envelopes in connection as an “insurance
adjuster” as defined in § 27-10-1.1, for an insurer or any insurer-retained vendor, where the results
are used in the investigation, negotiation, appraisal, or settlement of an insurance claim, shall be
licensed as a home inspector under this chapter unless exempt under another professional licensure
statute.
(6) “Public body” or “agency” means any executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory, or
administrative body of the state or any political subdivision thereof, including, but not limited to:
public officials elected or appointed; any department, division, agency, commission, board, office,
bureau, authority; any school, fire, or water district; or other agency or quasi-public agency of state
or local government that exercises governmental functions.
(7) “Residential building” means a structure consisting of one or more residences and their
appurtenances.
SECTION 3. Section 27-10-1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-10 entitled "Claim
Adjusters" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-10-1.1. Definitions.
(a) “Adjuster” means an individual licensed as either a public, company, or independent
adjuster.
(b) “Catastrophic disaster” according to the Federal Response Plan, means an event that
results in large numbers of deaths and injuries; causes extensive damage or destruction of facilities
that provide and sustain human needs; produces an overwhelming demand on state and local
response resources and mechanisms; causes a severe long-term effect on general economic activity;
and severely affects state, local, and private sector capabilities to begin and sustain response
activities. A catastrophic disaster shall be declared by the President of the United States, the
governor of the state, or the insurance commissioner.
(c) “Company adjuster” means a person who:
(1) Is an individual who contracts for compensation with insurers or self-insurers as an
employee; and
(2) Investigates, negotiates, or settles property, casualty, or workers’ compensation claims
for insurers or for self-insurers as an employee.
(d) “Department” means the insurance division of the department of business regulation.
(e) “Home state” means the District of Columbia and any state or territory of the United
States in which the adjuster’s principal place of residence or principal place of business is located.
LC003737 - Page 5 of 8

If neither the state in which the independent or company adjuster maintains the principal place of
residence, nor the state in which the adjuster maintains the principal place of business, has a
substantially similar law governing adjusters, the adjuster may declare another state in which it
becomes licensed and acts as an independent or company adjuster to be the “home state.”
(f) “Independent adjuster” means a person who:
(1) Is an individual who contracts for compensation with insurers or self-insurers as an
independent contractor; or
(2) Investigates, negotiates, or settles property, casualty, or workers’ compensation claims
for insurers or for self-insurers as an independent contractor.
(g) “Insurance adjuster” means a person who:
(1) On behalf of an insurer or any person or entity acting for or retained by an insurer,
investigates, inspects, evaluates, measures, documents, reports upon, or provides opinions
regarding damage, causation, scope of loss, repairability, replacement, or valuation of property,
when such activity is undertaken in connection with the investigation, negotiation, appraisal, or
settlement of an insurance claim.
(2) The term “insurance adjuster” shall apply regardless of the title, designation, or
description used by the person performing such services including, but not limited to, inspector,
consultant, field representative, building consultant, or appraiser, and regardless of whether such
services are performed directly for the insurer or indirectly through a vendor, contractor, or other
third party.
(3) Any person performing the activities described in this subsection without holding a
license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to be acting as an unlicensed insurance
adjuster.
(g)(h) “Insurance commissioner” means the director of the department of business
regulation or the director’s designee.
(h)(i) “NAIC” means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
(i)(j) “Public adjuster” means any person who, for compensation or any other thing of value
on behalf of the insured:
(1) Acts or aids, solely in relation to first-party claims arising under insurance contracts
that insure the real or personal property of the insured, other than automobile, on behalf of an
insured in negotiating for, or effecting the settlement of, a claim for loss or damage covered by an
insurance contract;
(2) Advertises for employment as a public adjuster of insurance claims or solicits business
or represents themself to the public as a public adjuster of first-party insurance claims for losses or
LC003737 - Page 6 of 8

damages arising out of policies of insurance that insure real or personal property; or
(3) Directly or indirectly solicits business, investigates or adjusts losses, or advises an
insured about first-party claims for losses or damages arising out of policies of insurance that insure
real or personal property for another person engaged in the business of adjusting losses or damages
covered by an insurance policy, for the insured.
(j)(k) “Uniform individual application” means the current version of the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) Uniform Individual Application for resident and
nonresident individuals.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003737
========
LC003737 - Page 7 of 8